Nebraska, session 109, LB368.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB368 LB368
2025 2025
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 4 of this act:
(a) Child means any child placed in a:
(i) Foster family home; or
(ii) Child-care institution through a court proceeding under
subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247;
(b) Child-care institution has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C.
672(c), as such section existed on January 1, 2025, and includes a
residential child-caring agency as defined in section 71-1926;
(c) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
and
(d) Foster family home includes a foster family home as defined in
42 U.S.C. 672(c), as such section existed on January 1, 2025, and as
defined in section 71-1901.
Sec. 2. (1) It is the policy of the Legislature to ensure that the
quality of care provided to a child placed in a foster family home or
child-care institution is as close as possible to the care a child would
receive in a family setting. To carry out such policy, the State of
Nebraska shall aspire to treat all children placed in foster family homes
or child-care institutions with dignity and respect, to provide such
children with honest and clear communication and information to help them
understand the system or systems in which they are involved, to provide
consistent opportunities for such children to have their voices heard in
their cases, to successfully reunify children with their families or help
such children find permanency, to support lifelong family connections for
such children, to place such children in an environment that accepts
their cultures and beliefs, and to provide such children with the skills,
knowledge, and resources they need to become successful adults.
(2) The rights and duties set forth in this section and section 3 of
this act shall be known as the Nebraska Youth in Care Bill of Rights. In
order to accomplish such goals, the department shall provide
developmentally appropriate information and notice that:
-2-

LB368 LB368
2025 2025
(a) Each child is permitted to attend religious services and
activities of the child's choice, or to choose not to attend, to be
balanced with the countervailing rights of the child's biological
parents, as provided under the First and Fourteenth Amendments to the
Constitution of the United States;
(b) Each child is in a placement that shares the child's religious
beliefs, when possible;
(c) Each child is free from unreasonable search and seizure as
provided under the Fourth Amendment to the Constitution of the United
States and as defined by state and federal law;
(d) Each child is safe and free from exploitation by staff and
contractors of the department, foster family members, and other persons
affiliated with the department, as provided under the Fourteenth
Amendment to the Constitution of the United States;
(e) Each child receives support for basic needs as provided under
the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and
section 43-290;
(f) Each child is free from discrimination on the basis of race,
ethnicity, sex, gender, national origin, tribal membership, religion,
mental or physical disability, gender identity, or sexual orientation;
(g) Each child who is also a parent is able to make decisions for
such parent's child as provided under the Fourteenth Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States;
(h) Each child who is also a parent of a child who is in the
parent's custody may provide input on the appropriateness of the
placement for such child;
(i) As required by section 43-272, a guardian ad litem is appointed
for each child to advocate for the interests of the child and, if
appropriate, legal counsel to protect the interests of such child;
(j) Each child has the opportunity to participate in age-appropriate
and developmentally appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, cultural,
-3-

LB368 LB368
2025 2025
and social activities as provided under section 43-4711;
(k) As required by federal law, each child, including a child that
is pregnant or parenting, receives a free and appropriate public
education and attends the same school in which the child was previously
enrolled unless it is contrary to the best interests of the child;
(l) Each child is provided timely notice of all court hearings in
proceedings involving the child and a youth court questionnaire, when
applicable, and has the ability to attend or participate in all court
hearings unless the court determines it is contrary to the best interests
of the child;
(m) Each child is provided all information, including the
information described in this section and section 3 of this act, in such
child's primary language as required by federal law;
(n) Each child with a disability is provided information in a manner
consistent with requirements under federal law;
(o) Each child has access, as determined by the child's physician,
to age-appropriate, developmentally appropriate, trauma-informed, and
medically accurate information, medical prevention services, medical
treatment, including an examination by a health care provider within two
weeks after initial removal from the home, and education on the child's
right to refuse or consent to medical treatment balanced with the
countervailing rights of the biological parents, unless contrary to the
best interests of the child or otherwise ordered by a court;
(p) Each child receives medical, dental, vision, and mental health
services regularly and as often as needed, while preserving the right of
the child to refuse or consent to treatment, unless contrary to the best
interests of the child or otherwise ordered by a court;
(q) Each child is prescribed and administered medications only as
necessary and is provided age-appropriate information about the
medications and possible side effects; and
(r) The assets of each child are protected and free from financial
-4-

LB368 LB368
2025 2025
and identity theft.
Sec. 3. (1) If applicable, the department shall:
(a) Facilitate a joint-sibling placement, unless it is contrary to
the safety or well-being of any of the siblings, as required by section
43-1311.02;
(b) Facilitate sibling visitation, if joint-sibling placement is not
possible, unless it is contrary to the safety or well-being of a sibling,
as required by section 43-1311.02;
(c) Inform a child of the child's right to joint-sibling placement
and visitation with siblings, including biological siblings, legal
siblings, half-siblings, and stepsiblings;
(d) Facilitate reunification with a child's biological parents as
required by state and federal law, unless contrary to the best interests
of the child or otherwise ordered by a court;
(e) Facilitate reasonable visitation with a child's biological
family and other significant individuals in the child's life as required
by state and federal law;
(f) Inform a child of the reasons for denying visitation or
placement;
(g) Inform a child who is adopted from foster care about post-
adoption services;
(h) Provide a child, including a child who is pregnant or parenting,
with an adequate plan to transition out of foster care and all related
services as required by section 43-1311.03;
(i) Ensure the confidentiality of information related to a child's
foster care case in a manner consistent with state and federal law; and
(j) Ensure a child has access to the child's birth certificate,
social security card, proof of health care coverage, medical and
educational records, power of attorney documents, and any other
information or documents as provided in section 43-1311.03.
(2) In order to ensure that each child is aware of the rights stated
-5-

LB368 LB368
2025 2025
in this section and section 2 of this act and is able to express a
grievance related to any infringement of such rights without penalty:
(a) Each caseworker shall be trained on the rights stated in this
section and section 2 of this act and how to discuss such rights in an
age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate manner with a child;
(b) Each caseworker shall provide a paper copy of the rights stated
in this section and section 2 of this act and shall discuss such rights
with each child who is at least fourteen years of age. Such discussion
shall occur (i) in the placement of the child within seventy-two hours
after initial placement and within two weeks after such placement and
(ii) quarterly at team meetings or at-home visits. The caseworker shall
request that the child sign an acknowledgment that the discussion has
occurred as required by section 43-4713;
(c) As part of the consultations required by subdivision (2)(d) of
section 43-272.01, each guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to section
43-272.01 shall discuss the rights stated in this section and section 2
of this act with each child within two weeks after appointment and once
every six months thereafter. The guardian ad litem shall discuss such
rights with the child again if a child discloses that the child believes
such rights have been infringed. The guardian ad litem shall raise such
infringement with the court unless it is determined by the guardian ad
litem to be without merit;
(d) A child may raise a grievance regarding the infringement of
rights stated in this section by filing a grievance with the department;
(e) Within three business days after receipt of a grievance, the
department shall provide acknowledgment of receipt, including contact
information, information on the grievance process, and obtaining review
under the Administrative Procedure Act; and
(f) The caseworker shall explain how to file a grievance and the
grievance process to a child in an age-appropriate manner. The caseworker
shall provide a child opportunities to privately discuss such rights and
-6-

LB368 LB368
2025 2025
the grievance process regularly, at intervals as determined by the
department.
(3) The rights stated in this section and 3 of this act shall be
discussed at every dispositional, review, and permanency planning hearing
at which the child is present as provided in section 43-4713.
Sec. 4. The Nebraska Strengthening Families Act Committee created
pursuant to section 43-4716 shall monitor the implementation of the
Nebraska Youth in Care Bill of Rights.
-7-